Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB614.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Shared Housing and Resource Exchange Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Aging of the Commonwealth."Participant." An individual who is at least 60 years of age, is a resident of this Commonwealth and is in need of housing."Program." The Shared Housing and Resource Exchange Program 12345678910111213141516 established in section 3."Program host." An individual who offers to provide housing to a participant and has been approved by the department for participation in the program.Section 3. Establishment of program.The Shared Housing and Resource Exchange Program is established in the department. The program shall assist participants with finding alternative housing offered by program hosts based on common interests, geographic preference and lifestyle choices.Section 4. Program hosts.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall establish a procedure by which an individual may submit an application to the department for approval as a program host.(b) Criteria.--An applicant must satisfy the following criteria to become an approved program host:(1) Be at least 18 years of age.(2) Occupy a residence with at least two bedrooms, one of which is to be occupied solely by the participant.(3) Not charge the participant more than 30% of the participant's gross monthly income as rent.(4) Enter into a home-sharing agreement with the participant.(5) Comply with any other condition established by the department for the health, safety and welfare of the participant and the program host.(c) Revocation of approval.--The department may revoke the approval of an individual to be a program host if the program host breaches the home-sharing agreement with the participant or otherwise fails to comply with the conditions established by the 20250HB0614PN0627 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department for the program host.Section 5. Matching procedure.The department shall establish a procedure by which an individual may apply to become a participant in the program. After the application is approved for participation in the program, the department shall attempt to locate a match between the participant and a program host and shall inform the participant of whether or not a program host has been located. If a program host has been located, the department shall facilitate the execution of a home-sharing agreement between the participant and program host.Section 6. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as deemed necessary to administer this act.Section 7. Appropriation.The General Assembly shall appropriate money from the General Fund to the department for implementation of the program.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0614PN0627 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819